Alaska, session 34, SB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 09 * Section 1. AS 21.96.070(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 10 (11) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 11 the children of the taxpayer's employees; 12 (12) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 13 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 01 children of the taxpayer's employees; and 02 (13) a payment to an employee of the taxpayer made by the taxpayer 03 for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the state. 04 * Sec. 2. AS 21.96.070 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the Department 06 of Labor and Workforce Development shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) 07 of this section for inflation, using 100 percent of the change over the preceding five 08 calendar years in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, 09 compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 10 * Sec. 3. AS 43.20.014(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 11 (17) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 12 the children of the taxpayer's employees; 13 (18) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 14 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 15 children of the taxpayer's employees; and 16 (19) a payment to an employee of the taxpayer made by the taxpayer 17 for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the state. 18 * Sec. 4. AS 43.20.014 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 19 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the Department 20 of Labor and Workforce Development shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) 21 of this section for inflation, using 100 percent of the change over the preceding five 22 calendar years in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, 23 compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 24 * Sec. 5. AS 43.55.019(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 25 (12) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 26 the children of the producer's employees; 27 (13) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 28 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 29 children of the producer's employees; and 30 (14) a payment to an employee of the producer made by the producer 31 for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the state. 01 * Sec. 6. AS 43.55.019 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 02 (j) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the Department 03 of Labor and Workforce Development shall adjust the limit under (d) of this section 04 for inflation, using 100 percent of the change over the preceding five calendar years in 05 the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, compiled by the 06 Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 07 * Sec. 7. AS 43.56.018(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 08 (12) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 09 the children of the property owner's employees; 10 (13) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 11 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 12 children of the property owner's employees; and 13 (14) a payment to an employee of the property owner made by the 14 owner for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the 15 state. 16 * Sec. 8. AS 43.56.018 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 17 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the department 18 shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) of this section for inflation, using 100 19 percent of the change over the preceding five calendar years in the Consumer Price 20 Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, compiled by the Bureau of Labor 21 Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 22 * Sec. 9. AS 43.65.018(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 23 (17) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 24 the children of the person's employees; 25 (18) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 26 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 27 children of the person's employees; and 28 (19) a payment to an employee of the person's business made by the 29 person for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the 30 state. 31 * Sec. 10. AS 43.65.018 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the department 02 shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) of this section for inflation, using 100 03 percent of the change over the preceding five calendar years in the Consumer Price 04 Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, compiled by the Bureau of Labor 05 Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 06 * Sec. 11. AS 43.75.018(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 07 (17) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 08 the children of the person's employees; 09 (18) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 10 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 11 children of the person's employees; and 12 (19) a payment to an employee of the person's business made by the 13 person for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the 14 state. 15 * Sec. 12. AS 43.75.018 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 16 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the Department 17 of Labor and Workforce Development shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) 18 of this section for inflation, using 100 percent of the change over the preceding five 19 calendar years in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, 20 compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 21 * Sec. 13. AS 43.77.045(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 22 (17) expenditures made to operate a child care facility in the state for 23 the children of the person's employees; 24 (18) contributions of cash or equipment accepted by a child care 25 facility in the state operated by a nonprofit corporation and attended by one or more 26 children of the person's employees; and 27 (19) a payment to an employee of the person's business made by the 28 person for the purpose of offsetting the employee's child care costs incurred in the 29 state. 30 * Sec. 14. AS 43.77.045 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 31 (i) Beginning January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the Department 01 of Labor and Workforce Development shall adjust the dollar limit on credits under (d) 02 of this section for inflation, using 100 percent of the change over the preceding five 03 calendar years in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, 04 compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 05 * Sec. 15. AS 21.96.070(a)(8), 21.96.070(a)(9), 21.96.070(a)(10), 21.96.070(g); 06 AS 43.20.014(a)(14), 43.20.014(a)(15), 43.20.014(a)(16), 43.20.014(g); AS 43.55.019(a)(9), 07 43.55.019(a)(10), 43.55.019(a)(11), 43.55.019(h); AS 43.56.018(a)(9), 43.56.018(a)(10), 08 43.56.018(a)(11), 43.56.018(g); AS 43.65.018(a)(14), 43.65.018(a)(15), 43.65.018(a)(16), 09 43.65.018(g); AS 43.75.018(a)(14), 43.75.018(a)(15), 43.75.018(a)(16), 43.75.018(g); 10 AS 43.77.045(a)(14), 43.77.045(a)(15), 43.77.045(a)(16), and 43.77.045(g) are repealed. 11 * Sec. 16. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 12 read: 13 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to July 23, 2024. 14 * Sec. 17. Section 50, ch. 15, SLA 2024, is repealed. 15 * Sec. 18. Section 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, and 16 sec. 30, ch. 4, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 17 Sec. 37. Sections 1, 2, and 21, ch. 61, SLA 2014, take effect January 1, 2028 18 [2029]. 19 * Sec. 19. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.